District of Columbia statutes.
16-4022

Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, approved June 30, 2000 (114 Stat. 464; 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c) ), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in § 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b) ).

History

May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-125, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1928

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 22 of the Uniform Collaborative Law Act.